src-fst-root.lexc.md
* **+Cmp** - Dynamic compound. This tag should always be part
of a dynamic compound. It is important for
Apertium, and useful in other cases as well.
* **+Cmp/Attr** - Attributive
* **+Cmp/SgNom** - Singular Nominative
* **+Cmp/SgGen** - Singular Genitive
* **+Cmp/PlGen** - Plural Genitiv
* **+Cmp/SplitR** - This is a split compound with the other part to
the right: "Arbeids- og inkluderingsdepartementet"
=> Arbeids- = +Cmp/SplitR
* **+Cmp/SplitL** - This is a split compound with the other part to the left
* **+Cmp/Sh** - testing +Cmp/Sh
* **+Cmp/Hyph** - on dynamic compounds that have a hyphen
* **+Cmp/NoHyph** - On compounds that COULD have had a hyphen (and usually have), but doesn't
* **+Cmp/SoftHyph** - Tags compounds containing SOFT HYPHENS (U+00AD)
* **+Cmp/Cit** - Tags citation compounds, which can in principle
cover any word. Requires a hyphen.

## Compounding tag ordering
To ease writing and maintaining regexes etc for manipulating and enforcing
compounding, it is important to keep the tags in a certain order.
The order is:
1. **+CmpN/** tags
1. **+CmpNP/** tags
1. **+Cmp/** tags - this is always true since the descriptive tags are always
part of the continuation lexicons, and will be located after the POS tag.

## Semantic tags to help disambiguation & synt. analysis: (before POS)

* +Sem/Act = Activity
* +Sem/Adr = Webadr
* +Sem/Amount = Amount
* +Sem/Ani = Animate
* +Sem/Aniprod = Animal Product
* +Sem/Body = Bodypart
* +Sem/Body-abstr = siellu, vuoig?a, jierbmi, (noe man kan bruke i fysisk aktivitet som en kroppsdel, f.eks. synet, stemmen, etc.)
* +Sem/Build = Building
* +Sem/Build-room = Room in a building, typically place to be
* +Sem/Buildpart = Part of Bulding, like the wall
* +Sem/Cat = Category
* +Sem/Clth = Clothes
* +Sem/Clth-jewl = Jewelery
* +Sem/Clthpart = part of clothes, boallu, sávdnji...
* +Sem/Ctain = Container
* +Sem/Ctain-abstr = Abstract container like bank account
* +Sem/Ctain-clth = Soft container, like a rucksack
* +Sem/Curr = Currency like dollár, Not Money
* +Sem/Date = Date
* +Sem/Dance = Dance
* +Sem/Dir = Direction like GPS-kursa
* +Sem/Domain = Domain like politics, reindeerherding (a system of actions)
* +Sem/Drink = Drink
* +Sem/Dummytag = Dummytag
* +Sem/Edu = Educational event
* +Sem/Event = Event
* +Sem/Feat = Feature, like Árvu. (noe som man kan ha mye eller lite av, det kan være en skala og som er på en måte karakteriserende. (høyde, vekt, farge, kreativitet etc.)
* +Sem/Feat-phys = Physiological feature, ivdni, fárda
* +Sem/Feat-psych = Psychological feauture
* +Sem/Feat-measr = Psychological feauture
* +Sem/Fem = Female name
* +Sem/Food = Food
* +Sem/Food-med = Medicine
* +Sem/Fruit = Fruits, vegetables, seeds, nuts
* +Sem/Furn = Furniture
* +Sem/Game = Game
* +Sem/Geom = Geometrical object
* +Sem/Group = Animal or Human Group
* +Sem/Hum = Human
* +Sem/Hum-abstr = Human abstract
* +Sem/Hum-prof = Human professional
* +Sem/Ideol = Ideology
* +Sem/ID = ID
* +Sem/Lang = Language
* +Sem/Mal = Male name
* +Sem/Mat = Material for producing things
* +Sem/Measr = Measure
* +Sem/Money = Has to do with money, like wages, not Curr(ency)
* +Sem/Obj = Object
* +Sem/Obj-clo = Cloth
* +Sem/Obj-cogn = Cloth
* +Sem/Obj-el = (Electrical) machine or apparatus
* +Sem/Obj-ling = Object with something written on it
* +Sem/Obj-rope = flexible ropelike object
* +Sem/Obj-surfc = Surface object
* +Sem/Org = Organisation
* +Sem/Part = Feature, oassi, bealli
* Perc = (perception) er noe man kan kjenne i en begrensa periode og som er forårsaka av noe utenifra, f.eks. Mus lea ballu. Mus lea bavččas.
* +Sem/Perc-cogn =
* +Sem/Perc-emo = Emotional perception
* +Sem/Perc-phys = Physical perception
* +Sem/Perc-psych = Psychological perception
* +Sem/Phonenr = Telephone number
* +Sem/Plant = Plant
* +Sem/Plantpart = Plant part
* +Sem/Plc = Place
* +Sem/Plc-abstr = Abstract place
* +Sem/Plc-elevate = Place
* +Sem/Plc-line = Place
* +Sem/Plc-water = Place
* +Sem/Pos = Position (as in social position job)
* +Sem/Process = Process
* +Sem/Prod = Product
* +Sem/Prod-audio = Audio product
* +Sem/Prod-cogn = Cognition product
* +Sem/Prod-ling = Linguistic product
* +Sem/Prod-vis = Visual product
* +Sem/Rel = Relation
* +Sem/Route = Route
* +Sem/Rule = Rule or convention
* +Sem/Semcon = Semantic concept
* +Sem/Sign = Sign (e.g. numbers, punctuation)
* +Sem/Sport = Sport
* +Sem/State =
* +Sem/State-sick = Illness
* +Sem/Substnc = Substance, like Air and Water
* +Sem/Sur = Surname
* +Sem/Symbol = Symbol
* +Sem/Time = Time
* +Sem/Time-clock = Time clock
* +Sem/Tool = Prototypical tool for repairing things
* +Sem/Tool-catch = Tool used for catching (e.g. fish)
* +Sem/Tool-clean = Tool used for cleaning
* +Sem/Tool-it = Tool used in IT
* +Sem/Tool-measr = Tool used for measuring
* +Sem/Tool-music = Music instrument
* +Sem/Tool-write = Writing tool
* +Sem/Txt = Text (girji, lávlla...)
* +Sem/Veh = Vehicle
* +Sem/Wpn = Weapon
* +Sem/Wthr = The Weather or the state of ground
* +Sem/Year - year (i.e. 1000 - 2999), used only for numerals

## Multiple Semantic tags:
* +Sem/Act_Fruit
* +Sem/Act_Group Activity and Group
* +Sem/Act_Hum Activity and Human
* +Sem/Act_Plc   A persons job is an activity, and a place as well
* +Sem/Act_Route Activity and Route, ie johtolat
* +Sem/Act_Tool-it
* **+Sem/Amount_Build**   Amount and Building
* +Sem/Amount_Semcon
* +Sem/Ani_Body-abstr_Hum
* +Sem/Ani_Build
* +Sem/Ani_Buildpart
* +Sem/Ani_Build_Hum_Txt
* +Sem/Ani-fish
* +Sem/Ani_Group
* +Sem/Ani_Group_Hum
* +Sem/Ani_Group_Prod-vis
* +Sem/Ani_Hum
* +Sem/Ani_Hum_Plc
* +Sem/Ani_Hum_Time
* +Sem/Ani_Plc
* +Sem/Ani_Plc_Txt
* +Sem/Ani_Time
* +Sem/Ani_Veh
* +Sem/Aniprod_Hum
* +Sem/Aniprod_Obj-clo
* +Sem/Aniprod_Perc-phys
* +Sem/Aniprod_Plc
* +Sem/Aniprod_Plc_Route
* +Sem/Body-abstr_Feat-psych
* +Sem/Body-abstr_Prod-audio_Semcon
* +Sem/Body_Body-abstr
* +Sem/Body_Clth
* +Sem/Body_Food
* +Sem/Body_Group_Hum
* +Sem/Body_Group_Hum_Time
* +Sem/Body_Hum
* +Sem/Body_Mat
* +Sem/Body_Measr
* +Sem/Body_Obj_Tool-catch
* +Sem/Body_Plc
* +Sem/Body_Plc-elevate
* +Sem/Body_Time
* +Sem/Build_Clthpart
* +Sem/Build_Edu_Org
* +Sem/Build_Event_Org
* +Sem/Build_Obj
* +Sem/Build_Org
* +Sem/Build_Route
* +Sem/Build-room_Cat_Ctain_Mat
* +Sem/Buildpart_Cat
* +Sem/Buildpart_Cat_Ctain
* +Sem/Buildpart_Cat_Ctain_Mat
* +Sem/Buildpart_Ctain
* +Sem/Buildpart_Ctain_Mat
* +Sem/Buildpart_Ctain_Obj
* +Sem/Cat_Group_Hum
* +Sem/Cat_Group_Hum_Plc
* +Sem/Cat_Edu
* +Sem/Cat_Obj
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Curr
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Curr_Obj
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Curr_Obj_Org
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Fruit
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Money
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Plant
* +Sem/Clth_Hum
* +Sem/Clth_Obj-clo
* +Sem/Ctain-abstr_Org
* +Sem/Ctain-clth_Plant
* +Sem/Ctain-clth_Veh
* +Sem/Ctain_Feat-phys
* +Sem/Ctain_Furn
* +Sem/Ctain_Plc
* +Sem/Ctain_Tool
* +Sem/Ctain_Tool-measr
* +Sem/Curr_Org
* +Sem/Dance_Org
* +Sem/Dance_Prod-audio
* +Sem/Domain_Food-med
* +Sem/Domain_Hum
* +Sem/Domain_Prod-audio
* +Sem/Drink_Plant
* +Sem/Edu_Event
* +Sem/Edu_Geom
* +Sem/Edu_Group_Hum
* +Sem/Edu_Hum
* +Sem/Edu_Mat
* +Sem/Edu_Org
* +Sem/Event_Food
* +Sem/Event_Hum
* +Sem/Event_Plc
* +Sem/Event_Plc-elevate
* +Sem/Event_Time
* +Sem/Feat-measr_Plc
* +Sem/Feat-phys_Tool-write
* +Sem/Feat-phys_Veh
* +Sem/Feat-phys_Wthr
* +Sem/Feat-psych_Hum
* +Sem/Feat-psych_Plc
* +Sem/Food_Obj-surfc
* +Sem/Feat_Plant
* +Sem/Food_Perc-phys
* +Sem/Food_Plant
* +Sem/Food_Sign
* +Sem/Fruit_Hum
* +Sem/Game_Obj-play
* +Sem/Geom_Hum_Plc
* +Sem/Geom_Obj
* +Sem/Group_Hum
* +Sem/Group_Hum_Org
* +Sem/Group_Hum_Plc
* +Sem/Group_Hum_Plc-abstr
* +Sem/Group_Hum_Prod-vis
* +Sem/Group_Hum_Time
* +Sem/Group_Org
* +Sem/Group_Prod-vis
* +Sem/Group_Sign
* +Sem/Group_Txt
* +Sem/Hum_Lang
* +Sem/Hum_Lang_Plc
* +Sem/Hum_Lang_Time
* +Sem/Hum_Mat_Tool
* +Sem/Hum_Obj
* +Sem/Hum_Org
* +Sem/Hum_Part
* +Sem/Hum_Plant
* +Sem/Hum_Plc
* +Sem/Hum_Sign
* +Sem/Hum_Tool
* +Sem/Hum_Tool-it = Human
* +Sem/Hum_Veh
* +Sem/Hum_Wthr
* +Sem/Lang_Tool
* +Sem/Mat_Plant
* +Sem/Mat_Txt
* +Sem/Measr_Obj_Time
* +Sem/Measr_Sign = Sign (e.g. numbers, punctuation)
* +Sem/Measr_Time
* +Sem/Money_Obj
* +Sem/Money_Org
* +Sem/Money_Part
* +Sem/Money_Txt
* +Sem/Obj-play
* +Sem/Obj-play_Sport
* +Sem/Obj_Semcon
* +Sem/Obj_Sign
* +Sem/Obj_Veh
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Org
* +Sem/Obj_Symbol
* +Sem/Org_Rule
* +Sem/Org_Buildpart 
* +Sem/Org_Txt
* +Sem/Org_Veh
* +Sem/Part_Prod-cogn
* +Sem/Part_Substnc
* +Sem/Perc-emo_Wthr
* +Sem/Plant_Plantpart
* +Sem/Plant_Tool
* +Sem/Plant_Tool-measr
* +Sem/Plc-abstr_Rel_State
* +Sem/Plc-abstr_Route
* +Sem/Plc_Pos
* +Sem/Plc_Route
* +Sem/Plc_Semcon
* +Sem/Plc_State
* +Sem/Plc_Substnc
* +Sem/Plc_Substnc_Wthr
* +Sem/Plc_Time
* +Sem/Plc_Tool-catch
* +Sem/Plc_Txt
* +Sem/Plc_Wthr
* +Sem/Prod-audio_Txt
* +Sem/Prod-cogn_Txt
* +Sem/Semcon_Txt
* +Sem/Obj_State
* +Sem/Substnc_Wthr
* +Sem/Plc_Time_Wthr
* +Sem/Time_Wthr
* +Sem/State-sick_Substnc
* +Sem/Obj-ling_Obj-surfc
* +Sem/Org_Prod-audio
* +Sem/Org_Prod-cogn
* +Sem/Org_Prod-vis

* **+Allegro** from LEXICON GOADE-IU-

# Tags for derivation

Explanation:
- Combinations 1, 2, 3, 1+2, 2+3, 1+3, 1+2+3 are ok, all other ones are blocked.
- The suffixes marked as +Der1+Der2 to the right cannot combine with Der2, they
have already "saturated" their Der2-part.
- Phonotactically, Der1 are initial consonants C, Der2 are VCV, and
Der2 are of a different kind, more like compounding.
- This whole Der123 business is to prevent back-derivation of
boahtigoahtijuvvohallat and the like.
- Computationally, the `+Der1` etc tags are replaced with flag diacritics blocking
forbidden combinations.

## Positional derivational tags

| `+Der1` | `+Der2` | `+Der3` | `+Der4` | POS transition | Comments |
|:------- |:------- |:------- |:------- |:--------------:|:-------- |
| `+Der/Dimin` |  |  |  | NN | (was: Der/aš & Der/š)
| `+Der/lasj` |  |  |  | NA | 
| `+Der/meahttun` |  |  |  | VA | 
| `+Der/d` |  |  |  | VV | 
| `+Der/h` |  |  |  | VV | - -hit/Causative
| `+Der/Caus` |  |  |  | VV | - -ahtti/Causative
| `+Der/huhtti` |  |  |  | VV | 
| `+Der/l` |  |  |  | VV | 
| `+Der/st` |  |  |  | VV | 
| `+Der/las` |  |  |  | VA | * +Der1+Der2 - can only combine with Der3
| `+Der/Car` |  |  |  | NA | * +Der1+Der2 - can only combine with Der3
| `+Der/laakan` |  |  |  | AA | * +Der1+Der2 - can only combine with Der3
| `+Der/halla` |  |  |  | VV | * +Der1+Der2 - can only combine with Der3
| `+Der/huvva` |  |  |  | VV | * +Der1+Der2 - can only combine with Der3
| `+Der/stuvva` |  |  |  | VV | * +Der1+Der2 - can only combine with Der3
| `+Der/PassS` |  |  |  | VV | - short passive
|  | `+Der/t` |  |  | NA
|  | `+Der/ár` |  |  | ACRO>N
|  | `+Der/NomAg` |  |  | VN
|  | `+Der/NomAct` |  |  | VN | Der/NomAct har to realisasjonar, med ulike restriksjonar, this is previous Der/eapmi
|  | `+Der/sasj` |  |  | NA
|  | `+Der/adda` |  |  | VV
|  | `+Der/alla` |  |  | VV
|  | `+Der/AAdv` |  |  | QA | check this!
|  | `+Der/easti` |  |  | VV
|  | `+Der/laagasj` |  |  | QA
|  | `+Der/Comp` |  |  | AA
|  | `+Der/Superl` |  |  | AA
|  |  | `+Der/PassL` |  | VV | long passive
|  |  | `+Der/vuota` |  | AN
|  |  |  | `+Der/InchL` | VV
|  |  |  | `+Der/amoš` | VN
|  |  |  | `+Der/eamoš` | VN
|  |  |  | `+Der/geahtes` | VA
|  |  |  | `+Der/keahtta` | VA
|  |  |  | `+Der/muš` | VN
|  |  |  | `+Der/supmi` | VN
|  |  |  | `+Der/upmi` | VN

## Non-positional derivations
All non-positional derivations should be preceded by the following tag, to make it possible
to target regular expressions at all derivations in a language-independent way:
just specify `+Der|+Der1 .. +Der4` and you are set.

| Tag | POS transition | Comment |
|:--- |:--------------:|:------- |
| `+Der` |   n/a   | generic derivation tag used in front of all non-positional derivations.
| `+Der/veara` | NA#     |
| `+Der/viđá` | NA#     |
| `+Der/viđi` | NA#     |
| `+Der/has` | ?       | only one in the code

## Miscellanious list
See lexicons NAMAT and SAS for these:

* **+Der/A** = Adjective derivated from Noun or Verb
* **+Der/Adv** = Adverb derivated from Adjective

# Tags for originating language
